Hawaii statutes.
§577E-3 Members; terms; chair; quorum;
compensation. (a) The commission shall consist of fifteen members and
reflect the geographic and cultural diversity of the State. The membership
shall include:

(1) Ex officio, the director of human services, superintendent
of education, director of health, attorney general, director of public safety,
and executive director of the office of youth services, or their designees; and

(2) Eight voting members shall be appointed by the
governor as provided in section 26-34, except as otherwise provided in this
section, as follows:

(A) Two members shall be appointed by the
governor from a list of three nominees submitted by the president of the
senate, and two members shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three
nominees submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(B) Four members shall be appointed by the
governor from the community.

(3) One voting member shall be designated by the
Hawaii Coalition for Dads.

(b) Of the appointed members, there shall be
at least one member from each of the counties of Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii.

(c) All members shall serve for a term of four
years. Any vacancies occurring in the membership of the commission shall be
filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the
original appointments. No member shall serve on the commission for more than
two terms; provided that if a member fills a vacancy and serves for the
remainder of an unexpired term that member shall be considered to have served
one term.

(d) The chair and vice chair of the board
shall be selected annually from the nongovernmental members of the commission
appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(2). A simple majority shall constitute a
quorum, whose affirmative vote shall be necessary for all actions.

(e) The members shall serve without
compensation.

(f) Any member of the commission shall be
immune from civil liability as provided in section 26-35.5. [L 2003, c 156, pt
of §2; am L 2005, c 148, §2; am L 2006, c 232, pt of §1; am L 2007, c 190, §1;
am L 2011, c 38, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next